Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1309
Commission; property; exempt from taxation.

The commission, its income, revenue and other receipts and all properties or rights and interest therein shall be exempt from all taxation in this state.

Laws 1971, LB 1003, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2609.